Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.835

Lead contamination in drinking water in school buildings—State-tribal compact schools.

The department shall allow state-tribal compact schools established under chapter 28A.715 RCW to opt into sampling and testing for lead contamination at drinking water outlets in school buildings built, or with all plumbing replaced, before 2016 pursuant to RCW 43.70.830.

[ 2021 c 154 s 4.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Short title—2021 c 154: See notes following RCW 43.70.830.